el: Λογισμικό: Υπηρεσίες cloud; Λογισμικό υπολογιστών; Ψηφιακά αγαθά & νομίσματα; Λογισμικό βιντεοπαιχνιδιών
es: Software: Servicios en la nube; Software informático; Bienes y moneda digitales; Software de videojuegos
ru: Программное обеспечение: Облачные сервисы; Программное обеспечение для компьютеров; Цифровые товары и валюта; Видеоигры
tr: Yazılım: Bulut Hizmetleri; Bilgisayar Yazılımları; Dijital Ürünler ve Elektronik Para; Video Oyun Yazılımları
fr: Logiciels: Services cloud; Logiciels informatiques; Biens et monnaie virtuels; Jeux vidéo
da: Software: Skytjenester; Computersoftware; Digitale varer og valuta; Videospilsoftware
fi: Ohjelmisto: Pilvipalvelut; Tietokoneohjelmisto; Digitaaliset tuotteet ja valuutta; Videopeliohjelmisto
bg-BG: Софтуер: Облачни услуги; Компютърен софтуер; Цифрови стоки и валута; Софтуер за видео игри
pl: Oprogramowanie: Usługi w chmurze; Programy komputerowe; Towary i waluty cyfrowe; Gry wideo
pt-PT: Software: Serviços na nuvem; Software de computador; Moedas e bens digitais; Software de videojogos
zh-TW: 軟體: 雲端服務; 電腦軟體; 數位商品和貨幣; 電玩遊戲軟體
zh-CN: 软件: 云服务; 电脑软件; 数字商品与货币; 电子游戏软件
th: ซอฟต์แวร์: บริการคลาวด์; ซอฟต์แวร์คอมพิวเตอร์; สินค้าและสกุลเงินดิจิทัล; ซอฟต์แวร์วิดีโอเกม
ko: 소프트웨어: 클라우드 서비스; 컴퓨터 소프트웨어; 디지털 상품/화폐; 비디오 게임 소프트웨어
hr-HR: Softver: Usluge u oblaku; Računalni softver; Digitalna dobra i valuta; Softver za video igre
ja: ソフトウェア: クラウドサービス; PCソフト; デジタルコンテンツ・仮想通貨; テレビゲームソフト
it: Software: Servizi cloud; Software per computer; Software contenuti digitali; Software video game
nl: Software: Clouddiensten; Computersoftware; Software voor digitale inhoud; Videogamesoftware
en: Software: Cloud Services; Computer Software; Digital Goods & Currency; Video Game Software
cs: Software: Cloudové služby; Počítačový software; Digitální obsah a měna; Software pro videohry
sl-SI: Programska oprema: Storitve v oblaku; Računalniška programska oprema; Digitalno blago in valuta; Programska oprema za video igre
de: Software: Cloud-Dienste; Computersoftware; Digital-Content-Software; PC- & Videospiele
pt-BR: Software: Serviços na nuvem; Software de computador; Software de conteúdo digital; Software de videogame
sk-SK: Softvér: Cloudové služby; Počítačový softvér; Digitálny tovar a mena; Softvér pre videohry
vi: Phần mềm: Dịch vụ điện toán đám mây; Phần mềm máy tính; Hàng hóa và đơn vị tiền tệ kỹ thuật số; Phần mềm trò chơi điện tử
lt-LT: Programinė įranga: Debesų paslaugos; Kompiuterių programinė įranga; Skaitmeninės prekės ir valiuta; Vaizdo žaidimų programinė įranga
sv: Programvara: Molntjänster; Datorprogramvara; Digitala varor och valutor; Dataspel
hu: Szoftver: Felhőszolgáltatások; Számítógépes szoftver; Digitális áruk és valuta; Videojáték szoftver
ro-RO: Software: Servicii în cloud; Software de calculator; Bunuri și monede digitale; Software pentru jocuri video
nb: Programvare: Skytjenester; Dataprogramvare; Digitale varer og valutaer; Videospillprogramvare